apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="ofer/ir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iríem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iríeu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iries</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irien</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iré</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ireu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iràs</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iran</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irà</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>íssim</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ís</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>íssiu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>issis</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>issin</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ís</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>írem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íreu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ires</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>iren</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>iguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>iguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ix</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>isquen</l>   <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>isquen</l>   <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixi</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>isca</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixi</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>isca</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íem</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íeu</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ien</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>íssim</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>írem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ís</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ira</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>íssiu</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>íreu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>issis</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ires</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>issin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>iren</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ís</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ira</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>tes</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ides</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ta</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ida</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ts</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>its</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>t</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>it</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="bastir" a="prompsit"><i>bast</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enfollir" a="prompsit"><i>enfoll</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enfurir" a="prompsit"><i>enfur</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="espaordir" a="prompsit"><i>espaord</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oferir">          <i>ofer</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="preexistir" a="prompsit"><i>preexist</i><par n="ofer/ir__vblex"/></e>
